Maine, session 132, LD879.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §7482, first ¶, as amended by PL 2009, c. 428, §1, is further
amended to read:
Notwithstanding the total amount of a debt or contract, a "small claim" means a right
of action cognizable by a court if the debt or damage does not exceed $6,000 exclusive of
interest and costs. For a right of action related to a home construction contract as defined
in Title 10, section 1486, subsection 4, the debt or damage may not exceed $25,000
exclusive of interest and costs. It does not include an action involving the title to real estate.